Utah statutes.
7-1-613.   Incompetency of savings account owner.

When a savings account is held in any depository institution by a person who becomes incompetent and an adjudication of incompetency has been made by a court of competent jurisdiction, the institution may pay or deliver the withdrawal value of the savings account and any earnings that may have accrued on the account to the conservator for that person upon proof of his appointment and qualification. However, if the institution has received no written notice and is not on actual notice that the savings account holder has been adjudicated incompetent, it may pay or deliver the funds to the holder in accordance with the provision of the savings account contract, and the receipt or acquittance of the holder therefor shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the institution for the payment or delivery so made.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

